public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
aƚastar/A
alienar/A
amarexar/A
angaređar/A
arđerar/A
dexarmiđar/A
inasprir/A
inaŧidir/A
axear/A
dexbafarar/A
inbajokar/A
xbalar/A
xbaƚixar/A
xbaƚotar/A
bandir/A
inbaoxar/A
inbarbaɉar/A
xbaroŧar/A
xbàter/A
xbatolar/A
inbavarar/A
xbefedar/A
xberlar/A
strabéver/A
biankidar/A
xbilanŧar/A
inbiondir/A
bixar/A
rebóɉer/A
xbokar/A
bolsar/A
inbonbaxar/A
bordexar/A
inboskar/A
bosar/A
brakar/A
bramar/A
braŧolar/A
dexbriagar/A
xbrodacar/A
bronbar/A
inbrunir/A
bufonar/A
inbutiƚiar/A
cacerar/A
scauŧar/A
decèñer/A
incepar/A
descodar/A
dir/A
danedar/A
dexdeñar/A
dialogar/A
kontradíxer/A
doƚer/A
predomenar/A
dormir/A
xdrelar/A
dedúxer/A
xaƚixar/A
xenerar/A
dontar/A
radónxer/A
rinxovenar/A
kondurar/A
ekonomiđar/A
ensir/A
estenuar/A
exíster/A
stupefar/A
sfaldar/A
famejar/A	po:verb
faoređar/A
rinfaŧar/A
favorixar/A
spesifegar/A
infenocar/A
deskonfermar/A
fiabar/A
fiaskexar/A
filar/A
filtrar/A
sfiorir/A
fiskalidar/A
sfoderar/A
afolar/A
traforar/A
formalixar/A
renforsar/A
frakasar/A
frapolar/A
fraturar/A
desfregoƚar/A
fritegar/A
fruñar/A
fumar/A
futuridar/A
gaƚar/A
gaƚonar/A
inganbarar/A
xgarbar/A
xgargaridar/A
ingaxetar/A
glutinar/A
xgoñar/A
retrogradir/A
grandexar/A
ingrasar/A
agredir/A
gretolar/A
ingrinŧar/A
xgriŧolar/A
ingrosar/A
gusar/A
gucar/A
inguxeƚar/A
inestar/A
inpiokar/A
interiŧir/A
inxuriar/A
injandolir/A
xɉasar/A
inɉemar/A
jostrar/A
ɉosoƚar/A
dexjustar/A
skaenar/A
inkaƚir/A
kalkañar/A
kalsar/A
kaƚuñar/A
skanbiar/A
skanpar/A
skanselar/A
kapitolar/A
karakoƚar/A
skarmir/A
karpionar/A
inkartoŧar/A
rekatar/A
kativar/A
inkaucar/A
skavaƚesar/A
skekexar/A
inkogoƚar/A
deskokonar/A
deskolorir/A
skomenŧar/A
skonbàter/A
konpanadegar/A
kontentar/A
rekonsar/A
okórer/A
akòrder/A
korniđar/A
skorsixar/A
kosar/A
skovèrđer/A
inkrespar/A
krivelar/A
inkrostoƚar/A
kuacar/A
skuercar/A
skufonar/A
skulaŧar/A
skursar/A
ƚakonixar/A
ƚanpar/A
ƚapiar/A
ƚaskar/A
xlavasar/A
lekar/A
ƚemoxinar/A
arlevar/A
ƚiberar/A
xligar/A
interlinear/A
litigar/A
dexloɉar/A
alosar/A
inluminar/A
tralúxer/A
mainar/A
xmalsar/A
manedar/A
xmañar/A
remarkar/A
martiridar/A
xmaseƚar/A
xmatiđar/A
maŧipar/A
destramexar/A
meɉorar/A
inmenestrar/A
meretar/A
manométer/A
mijorar/A
xmirar/A
moɉar/A
xmolar/A
mondar/A
moraliđar/A
xmorfir/A
demostrar/A
mucarar/A
multar/A
mutiƚar/A
xnaredar/A
dexnaxoƚar/A
xnetar/A
nojar/A
notar/A
inuvoƚir/A
xñokolar/A
oɉar/A
oltrigar/A
ondar/A
dexorbar/A
orlar/A
ovatar/A
pair/A
inpajar/A
palentar/A
paƚixar/A
inpaƚudar/A
spantađar/A
papusar/A
paređar/A
repartir/A
oltrepasar/A
pasteđar/A
patinar/A
inspasientar/A
pedorar/A
apelar/A
inpelugar/A
sospénder/A
penetrar/A
despeocar/A
inperletar/A
apetir/A
spetoƚar/A
pesolatar/A
inpiantar/A
piatonar/A
apikar/A
pinsar/A
pirar/A
pitokar/A
spisolar/A
replikar/A
inpoltronir/A
antepóner/A
ponarar/A
pontelar/A
trapónxer/A
soportar/A
inpotar/A
prategar/A
despreŧar/A
inprimar/A
protokolar/A
despuƚexar/A
inputar/A
irabiar/A
xraixar/A
ranpinar/A
rasir/A
recar/A
inkuidir/A
rénder/A
rexistrar/A
iriŧar/A
robar/A
roexar/A
romatixar/A
dexroñar/A
roversar/A
rufar/A
rutar/A
desagrar/A
arsalar/A
saliđar/A
insalviar/A
saraxinar/A
scafedar/A
scopadar/A
strasekolar/A
proseguir/A
deseɉar/A
deselexar/A
insensar/A
separar/A
sesolar/A
sfrixegar/A
sijiƚar/A
singolariđar/A
sixolar/A
skandalixar/A
skarselar/A
inskaturir/A
skitolar/A
skorŧar/A
skriŧolar/A
soaŧar/A
resoƚar/A
solfiđar/A
sonetar/A
sorseɉar/A
sovranixar/A
spatoƚar/A
spergoŧar/A
spicar/A
spirar/A
respónder/A
sputanar/A
kontrastajar/A
stankexar/A
istekar/A
instigar/A
restituir/A
istokar/A
stranir/A
kostrénđer/A
strufiñar/A
sufrajar/A
intabarar/A
stanar/A
intarsiar/A
tediar/A
tenporeɉar/A
astèñer/A
sterminar/A
tiranidar/A
tondar/A
stortar/A
atràer/A
trnakuiƚixar/A
intravajar/A
trinŧar/A
tuar/A
sapegar/A
ŧelebrar/A
inserceƚar/A
sexelar/A
ŧinkuantar/A
sivilixar/A
inŧukarar/A
reuxar/A
rinvangar/A
provéder/A
revénder/A
soveñir/A
xverxelar/A
divertir/A
videgar/A
viŧiar/A
vokaƚixar/A
xvoltoƚar/A
xbabaŧar/A
xermoɉar/A
xñakar/A
despòser/A
sirkumnavegar/A
kanalixar/A
bosolar/A
inorbir/A
ratar/A
sfexar/A
stordar/A
kanŧonar/A
stantir/A
